Maine, session 132, LD1366.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1107-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 308, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Cocaine and the quantity possessed is more than 14 grams; or
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1107-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 308, §1, is
further amended by repealing subparagraph (2).
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1118-A, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 485, §3, is
amended to read:
C. At the time of the offense, the person illegally imports cocaine in a quantity of 112
grams or more or cocaine in the form of cocaine base in a quantity of 32 grams or more.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class A crime;
Page 1 - 132LR2001(03)